Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468A.187 is amended to read:
468A.187. (1) (a) The Natural and Working Lands  Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the Natural and Working Lands
Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(b) The Natural and Working Lands  Fund consists of moneys appropriated to the fund
by the Legislative Assembly and moneys  deposited in the fund from any other public or pri-
vate source.
(c) Moneys in the Natural and Working Lands Fund are  continuously appropriated to the
Oregon  Watershed  Enhancement Board for the purpose of transferring moneys to the funds de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section as directed by the Oregon  Climate Action Commission under
ORS 468A.189.
(2) The board shall annually transfer moneys in the  Natural and Working Lands Fund to the
following funds in accordance with ORS 468A.189:
(a) The Agriculture Natural Climate Solutions Fund established under ORS 561.157.
(b) The Forestry Natural Climate Solutions Fund established under ORS 526.127.
(c) The Watershed Natural Climate Solutions Fund established under ORS 541.936.
(d) The Fish and Wildlife Natural Climate Solutions Fund established under ORS 496.268.
SECTION 2.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4102 (HB 4102-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House February 15, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4102 (HB 4102-INTRO) Page 2